Hawaii statutes.
[§350E-9] Executive head. As used in
Article VII of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the term
"executive head" means the governor. The governor may appoint a
compact administrator in accordance with the terms of Article VII. [L 1985, c
132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next